Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1504
Applicant for permit; option to contribute
to fund.

On
or before July 1, 2012, the commission shall provide each applicant the option
on the application for any type of hunting permit authorizing the taking of
deer to indicate that the applicant may designate an amount in addition to
the permit fee to be credited to the Hunters Helping the Hungry Cash Fund.

Laws 2012, LB928, § 8.